Utah statutes.
76-9-803.   Penalties regarding criminal street gang activities.
(1)  It is a class B misdemeanor to:
(a)  solicit, recruit, entice, or intimidate a minor to join a criminal street
gang, whether or not the minor actually joins the criminal street gang;
(b)  conspire to commit any act under Subsection (1)(a) with the intent to
cause a minor to join a criminal street gang; or
(c)  use intimidation to prevent or attempt to prevent a minor from leaving a
criminal street gang or ending the minor's affiliation with a criminal street
gang.
(2)  It is a class A misdemeanor for any person who is a member of or actively
involved with a criminal street gang to:
(a)  intimidate or otherwise cause a minor to commit or attempt to commit any
misdemeanor criminal offense; or
(b)  commit a violation of Subsection (1)(a):
(i)  more than once;
(ii)  regarding the same minor; and
(iii)  within a period of 180 days.
(3)  Prosecution for any offense under this section does not prohibit
prosecution for any other criminal offense.
